Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.200

Order terminating parent and child relationship—Rights of parties when granted.

(1) Upon the termination of parental rights pursuant to RCW 13.34.180, all rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations, including any rights to custody, control, visitation, or support existing between the child and parent shall be severed and terminated and the parent shall have no standing to appear at any further legal proceedings concerning the child, except as provided in RCW 13.34.215: PROVIDED, That any support obligation existing prior to the effective date of the order terminating parental rights shall not be severed or terminated. The rights of one parent may be terminated without affecting the rights of the other parent and the order shall so state.

(2) An order terminating the parent and child relationship shall not disentitle a child to any benefit due the child from any third person, agency, state, or the United States, nor shall any action under this chapter be deemed to affect any rights and benefits that an Indian child derives from the child's descent from a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(3) An order terminating the parent-child relationship shall include a statement addressing the status of the child's sibling relationships and the nature and extent of sibling placement, contact, or visits.

[ 2007 c 413 s 2; 2003 c 227 s 7; 2000 c 122 s 27; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 48.]

NOTES:

Severability—2007 c 413: See note following RCW 13.34.215.

Intent—2003 c 227: See note following RCW 13.34.130.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.